District of Columbia statutes.
5-116.02

Authority to establish additional procedures.

The Chief of Police may issue a General Order establishing additional procedures, not inconsistent with those prescribed in § 5-116.01, for the electronic recording of interrogations by the Metropolitan Police Department.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-351, § 102, 52 DCR 2275